Hawaii statutes.
§468E-3 Practice as speech pathologist or
audiologist; title or description of services. (a) A person represents
oneself to be a speech pathologist when the person:

(1) Holds oneself out to the public by any title or
description of services incorporating the words "speech pathologist",
"speech pathology", "speech therapy", "speech
correction", "speech correctionist", "speech therapist",
"speech clinic", "speech clinician", "language
pathologist", "language pathology", "logopedics",
"logopedist", "communicology", "communicologist",
"asphasiologist", "voice therapy", "voice therapist",
"voice pathology", or "voice pathologist", "language
therapist", or "phoniatrist", or any similar titles;

(2) Purports to treat stuttering, stammering, or
other disorders of speech;

(3) Is employed as a faculty member in speech
pathology;

(4) Is employed as a speech pathologist by the State
or any county agency.

(b) A person represents oneself to be an
audiologist when the person:

(1) Holds oneself out to the public by any title or
description of services incorporating the terms "audiology",
"audiologist", "audiological", "hearing clinic",
"hearing clinician", "hearing therapist", or any similar
titles;

(2) Is employed as a faculty member in audiology;

(3) Is employed as an audiologist by the State or any
county agency. [L 1974, c 48, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 242, §3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next